Nebraska, session 109, LB550.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB550 LB550
2025 2025
Section 1. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Educational decisionmaker has the same meaning as in section
79-530;
(b) Released time course means a course in religious instruction,
taught by a sponsoring entity, during which a student is excused from
public school to attend;
(c) School district has the same meaning as in section 79-101;
(d) Sponsoring entity means a private entity that offers students an
elective course in religious instruction pursuant to this section; and
(e) Secular evaluation criteria includes, but is not limited to:
(i) The number of hours of classroom instruction;
(ii) A review of the course syllabus that reflects course
requirements and materials used;
(iii) The methods of student assessment used in the course; and
(iv) The qualifications of the course instructor.
(2) On or before July 1, 2025, each school district shall adopt a
policy that excuses any student of such school district to attend a
released time course for at least one class period per week. Such policy
shall require:
(a) The parent, guardian, or educational decisionmaker of the
student to provide written consent for the student to attend the released
time course;
(b) The sponsoring entity to maintain attendance records and make
such records available to the school district the student attends;
(c) The sponsoring entity, parent, guardian, or educational
decisionmaker to provide transportation to and from the place of
instruction;
(d) The sponsoring entity to make provision and assume liability for
each student that attends its released time course while under the
control of the sponsoring entity;
(e) No school district funds to be expended other than de minimis
-2-

LB550 LB550
2025 2025
administrative costs; and
(f) A released time course not to be held on school district
property unless permitted under a neutral policy of equal access that
opens school district property for use by community groups.
(3) For any period of time a student is excused from a school
district to attend a released time course in accordance with this
section, such student shall be considered as attending the school from
which such student is excused for the purpose of determining school
funding and satisfying attendance requirements.
(4) A school district may adopt a policy that awards academic credit
for the completion of a released time course. In determining the amount
of credit to award for completion of such a course, the school district
shall evaluate the course based on purely secular criteria that are
substantially the same criteria used to evaluate similar courses. The
decision to award credit for a released time course shall be neutral to,
and shall not involve any test for, religious content or denominational
affiliation.
(5) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to deny a released
time course or the sponsoring entity equal access to funds, benefits, or
services that the school district may provide or make available to
community groups or other independent entities.
(6) Any person or organization aggrieved by a violation of this
section may bring an action against the school district responsible for
the violation and seek appropriate relief. For purposes of this
subsection, appropriate relief includes:
(a) Actual damages;
(b) Such preliminary and other equitable or declaratory relief as
may be appropriate; and
(c) Reasonable attorney's fees and other litigation costs reasonably
incurred.
Sec. 2. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
-3-

LB550 LB550
2025 2025
passed and approved according to law.
-4-